apertium-tur-kir.tur.lexc
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!!! TV BELOW
!
!LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!
!%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
! aç<t><tv><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
! kulluk e<t><tv><caus_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
! gi<t><tv><caus_ar><aor_ar> 
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
! çık<tv><caus_art><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR
! al<tv><caus_dir>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR  
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR
! üş<tv><caus_it>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR
! ak<tv><caus_it><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR
! bekle<tv><caus_t>
%<v%>%<tv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>t VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{bI%}%{LN%} VINFL-COMMON ;



LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON Verbs
iç:iç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! "drink"
iç:iç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! "drink"
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
üş:üş VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_IR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
üz:üz VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ak:ak VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR ; ! ""
aş:aş VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
dil:dil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
geç:geç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kaç:kaç VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
kur:kur VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sil:sil VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
sok:sok VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
tık:tık VTVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
çık:çık VTVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR ; ! ""
şaş:şaş VTVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
alıkoy:alıkoy VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
dokun:dokun VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eriş:eriş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
giriş:giriş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
aşağıla:aşağıla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
doku:doku VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eleştir:eleştir VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
frenle:frenle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
sıyrıl:sıyrıl VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ağna:ağna VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
alıkonul:alıkonul VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
demirle:demirle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
doğrul:doğrul VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
düzel:düzel VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
eri:eri VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gecele:gecele VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
ışılda:ışılda VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kes:kes VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "cut"
kışkır:kışkır VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "provoke"
kok:kok VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "smell"
kokla:kokla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "nose, smell"
konakla:konakla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "stop over"
kork:kork VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "fear, scare"
kov:kov VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "repel"
külle:külle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "cover with ashes"
kümele:kümele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "heap up"
kuşat:kuşat VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "hedge round"
morar:morar VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "become bruised"
mühürle:mühürle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "seal"
öngör:öngör VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "set forth"
önle:önle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "prevent"
öp:öp VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "kiss"
payla:payla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "rag"
püskür:püskür VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "spout"
sahiplen:sahiplen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "lay claims to"
sakatla:sakatla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "injure"
sal:sal VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "release"
sark:sark VIVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "depend from"
sars:sars VTVINFL-CAUS_IT-AOR_AR  ; ! "jolt"
serp:serp VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "sprinkle"
seyrel:seyrel VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "become rare"
şifrele:şifrele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "code"
silk:silk VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "shake something out"
soğur:soğur VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "absorb"
tak:tak VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "affix"
tanıkla:tanıkla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "produce a witness"
tartış:tartış VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "dispute"
terasla:terasla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "terrace"
terle:terle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "sweat"
tut:tut VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "keep"
üslen:üslen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "use place for military base"
üstele:üstele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "persist"
uyu:uyu VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "sleep"
ver:ver VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "give up"
yanıtla:yanıtla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "answer"
yas:yas VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "stave"
yavaşla:yavaşla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "slow down"
yen:yen VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "win"
yolla:yolla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR  ; ! "send"
yont:yont VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "sculp"
yum:yum VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "clench"
acı:acı VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "pity something"
akset:akset VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "be heard"
al:al VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "take, buy"
anımsa:anımsa VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "recall"
arıt:arıt VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "purify someone"
bahset:bahset VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "talk about"
başar:başar VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "success"
belir:belir VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "appear"
besle:besle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "feed"
bocala:bocala VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "falter"
boğ:boğ VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "choke"
bul:bul VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "find"
çel:çel VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "tempt"
damıt:damıt VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "distill"
damla:damla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "drop off"
defnet:defnet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "bury"
dengele:dengele VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "equalise"
diz:diz VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "align"
duraksa:duraksa VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "come to a stop"
duygulan:duygulan VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "be affected"
emret:emret VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "command"
etiketle:etiketle VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "tag"
fırla:fırla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "shoot ahead"
geliş:geliş VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "develop"
ger:ger VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "stretch"
güven:güven VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "trust"
havuzla:havuzla VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "drydock"
hisset:hisset VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "feel"
ilaçla:ilaçla VTVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "medicate"
incin:incin VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "hurt"
inle:inle VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_IR ; ! "sough"
iv:iv VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "accelarate"
katlet:katlet VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "massacre"
kavur:kavur VTVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "roast"
